test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_koccod_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - koččođ: # not checked
    koččođ+V+Inf: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koˊčom
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koˊčoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččo
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: koččovettee
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: koččov
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: koččop
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: koččovetteđ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: koččoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuččum
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuččuh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kočoi
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kočoin
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuččuu
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg1: koččoččim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg2: koččoččih
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg3: koččoččij
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du1: koččoččáim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du2: koččoččáid
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du3: koččoččáin
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl1: koččoččijm
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl2: koččoččijd
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl3: koččoččii
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg1: koččoeem
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg2: koččoeeh
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg3: koččo
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du1: koččoeen
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du2: koččovettee
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du3: koččouv
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl1: koččoep
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl2: koččovetteđ
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl3: koččoeh
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: koččoom
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kočo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kočos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du2: koččoo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: koččoop
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+PrsPrc: koččoee
    koččođ+V+PrfPrc: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ess: koččomin
    koččođ+V+Actio+Loc: koččomist
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    koččođ+V+Ger: koččodijn
    koččođ+V+VAbess: koččohánnáá



  Verb - njihhoođ: # MS checked
    njihhoođ+V+Inf: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiṿom
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njiṿoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiho
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njihovettee
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njihhoov
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njihovetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njihoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njiiḥum
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njiiḥuh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njiṿoi
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njivvoin
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njihhuu
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: njiṿoččim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: njiṿoččih
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: njiṿoččij
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: njiṿoččáim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: njiṿoččáid
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: njiṿoččáin
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: njiṿoččijm
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: njiṿoččijd
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: njiṿoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: njivvoom
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: njivvooh
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: njivvooš
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: njiṿožeen
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: njivvoošvettee
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: njiṿožává
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: njiṿožep
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: njivvoošvetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: njiṿožeh
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njiṿo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njiṿos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njiṿo
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: njiṿoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: njivvuu
    njihhoođ+V+PrsPrc: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+PrfPrc: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: njiḥomin
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: njiḥomist
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: njiḥomân
    njihhoođ+V+Ger: njivodijn
    njihhoođ+V+VAbess: njivohánnáá


  Verb - orroođ: # MS checked
    orroođ+V+Inf: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orom
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oṛo
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: oṛovettee
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orroov
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oṛovetteđ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oṛoh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uurrum
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uurruh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oroi
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oroin
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: urruu
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg1: oroččim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg2: oroččih
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg3: oroččij
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du1: oroččáim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du2: oroččáid
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du3: oroččáin
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl1: oroččijm
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl2: oroččijd
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl3: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg1: ooroom
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg2: oorooh
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg3: oorooš
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du1: orožeen
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du2: ooroošvettee
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du3: orožává
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl1: orožep
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl2: ooroošvetteđ
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl3: orožeh
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: orroom
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oro
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: oros
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du2: orroo
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: orroom
    orroođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: urruu
    orroođ+V+PrsPrc: orroo
    orroođ+V+PrfPrc: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ess: oṛomin
    orroođ+V+Actio+Loc: oṛomist
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ill: oṛomân
    orroođ+V+Ger: orodijn
    orroođ+V+VAbess: orohánnáá

  Verb - vahhoođ: # MS checked
    vahhoođ+V+Inf: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaṿom
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vaṿoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaho
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vahovettee
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vahhoov
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vahovetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vahoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vooḥum
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vooḥuh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaṿoi
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vavvoin
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vohhuu
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: vaṿoččim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: vaṿoččih
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: vaṿoččij
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: vaṿoččáim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: vaṿoččáid
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: vaṿoččáin
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: vaṿoččijm
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: vaṿoččijd
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: vaṿoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: vavvoom
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: vavvooh
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: vavvooš
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: vaṿožeen
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: vavvoošvettee
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: vaṿožává
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: vaṿožep
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: vavvoošvetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: vaṿožeh
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vaṿo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vaṿos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaṿo
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vaṿoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vovvuu
    vahhoođ+V+PrsPrc: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+PrfPrc: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: vaḥomin
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: vaḥomist
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: vaḥomân
    vahhoođ+V+Ger: vavodijn
    vahhoođ+V+VAbess: vavohánnáá
